Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Creation and Organization.

Sec. 44.88.010.
Legislative finding and policy.

The legislature finds, determines, and declares that

there exist areas of the state in which seasonal and nonseasonal unemployment exists;

this unemployment is a serious menace to the health, safety, and general welfare, not only to the people in those areas, but also to the people of the entire state;

the state lacks the basic manufacturing, industrial, energy, export, small business, and business enterprises and the other facilities referred to in this subsection necessary to permit adequate development of its natural resources and the balanced growth of its economy;

the establishment and expansion of industrial, manufacturing, energy, export, small business, and business enterprises in the state and the other facilities referred to in this subsection are essential to the development of the natural resources and the long-term economic growth of the state, and will directly and indirectly alleviate unemployment in the state;

the expansion of export trade is vital to the health and growth of the state’s economy;

many state businesses could benefit from additional financial and technical assistance with respect to the exportation of their products and services;

the Export-Import Bank of the United States has been mandated by the Export-Import Bank Act Amendments of 1983 to provide technical assistance and export financing support to small businesses in cooperation with state export finance agencies;

Alaska-based exporters can be effectively assisted through the establishment, as part of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority, of an export financing program designed to work with the Export-Import Bank of the United States and other federal, state, and private institutions;

the achievement of the goal of full employment and of establishment and continuing operation and development of industrial, manufacturing, energy, export, small business, and business enterprises in the state will be accelerated and facilitated by the creation of an instrumentality of the state with powers to incur debt, to own and operate facilities, and to make and insure loans to finance and to assist private lenders to make loans to finance the establishment, operation, and development of industrial, manufacturing, energy, export, small business, and business enterprises;

it is in the public interest to promote the prosperity and general welfare of all citizens of the state by

stimulating commercial and industrial growth and expansion by encouraging an increase of private investment by banks, investment houses, insurance companies, and other financial institutions, including pension and retirement funds, to help satisfy the need for economic expansion;

encouraging the production of raw materials and goods for export, the expansion of exports and raw materials and goods, and the rendering of services abroad by residents of the state through the establishment of a program that provides financial assistance in cooperation with federal, state, and private institutions for these purposes in the form provided in this chapter;

creating the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority with the powers necessary to accomplish the objectives stated in this paragraph, including the power to issue taxable and tax-exempt bonds, to acquire ownership interests in projects, and to provide development project financing as provided in this chapter;

it is in the state’s interest to import private capital to create new economic activity that would not otherwise take place in the state.

It is declared to be the policy of the state, in the interests of promoting the health, security, and general welfare of all the people of the state, and a public purpose, to increase job opportunities and otherwise to encourage the economic growth of the state, including the development of its natural resources, through the establishment and expansion of manufacturing, industrial, energy, export, small business, and business enterprises and the other facilities referred to in (a) of this section by creating the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority with the powers, duties, and functions as provided in this chapter.

It is further declared to be the policy of the state, in the interests of promoting the health, security, and general welfare of all the people of the state, and a public purpose of the state, to accomplish the objectives set out in (b) of this section through the provision of financial support to a federal, state, municipal, or private entity.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1977; am §§ 44 — 48 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 28 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 162 SLA 1984; am §§ 1, 2 ch 42 SLA 1987; am §§ 3, 4 ch 123 SLA 1990; am §§ 2, 3 ch 60 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.010. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For federal Export-Import Bank, see 12 U.S.C. 635.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 10, 2012, in (a), inserted “energy,” between “industrial,” and “export” in (a)(3); in (a)(4) and twice in (a)(9), inserted “energy,” between “manufacturing,” and “export”; in (b), inserted “energy,” between “industrial,” and “export,” and made stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment, effective May 30, 2013, in (a)(9), inserted “and” preceding “to make and insure loans to finance”; in (a)(10)(C) deleted “and” following “tax-exempt bonds” and inserted “, and to provide development project financing” following “acquire ownership interests in projects”; made stylistic changes throughout.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning ch. 26, SLA 2013 (SB 23) see 2013 Senate Journal 40 — 42.

Sec. 44.88.020.
Creation of authority.

There is created the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority. The authority is a public corporation of the state and a body corporate and politic constituting a political subdivision within the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, but with separate and independent legal existence.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am § 104 ch 218 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.020. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.88.030.
Membership of authority.

The membership of the authority consists of

the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development; and

five public members appointed by the governor, each of whom has expertise in private sector business or industry, or both, and possesses demonstrated leadership skills.

If a commissioner described in (a)(1) of this section is unable to attend a meeting of the authority, the commissioner may, by an instrument in writing filed with the authority, designate a deputy or assistant to act in the commissioner’s place as a member at the meeting. For all purposes of this chapter, the designee is a member of the authority at the meeting.

Public members of the authority described in (a)(2) of this section serve at the pleasure of the governor for two-year terms.

If a vacancy occurs in the membership of the authority, the governor shall immediately appoint a member for the unexpired portion of the term.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am § 7 ch 207 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 64 SLA 1977; am § 49 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 36 ch 168 SLA 1990; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 72 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.030. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For a legislative intent statement concerning the selection of the five public members of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority after the effective date of the 2010 amendments of this section, see § 1, ch. 72, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.
For a transitional provision relating to the duration of the terms of office of the three additional public members who are first appointed after the effective date of the 2010 amendments to (a) of this section, see § 5, ch. 72, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 9, 2010, rewrote and combined (a)(2) and (3), which read, “(2) one other person appointed by the governor who serves as the head of a principal department of the executive branch; and (3) two public members appointed by the governor.” and made a related change; in (b), substituted “commissioner” for “member”, or similar, three times, and deleted “or (a)(2)” following “described in (a)(1)”; in (c), substituted “Public members” for “Members”, deleted “and (a)(3)” following “described in (a)(2)”, and added “at the pleasure of the governor for” following “of this section serve”.

Sec. 44.88.040.
Chairman and vice-chairman.

The members of the authority shall elect a chairman from among themselves.
A vice-chairman may be elected by the authority from among its other members. The vice-chairman presides over all meetings in the absence of the chairman and has other duties which the authority may direct.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am § 105 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 51 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.040. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.88.050.
Meetings, compensation, officers, and employees.

A majority of the members of the authority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business or the exercise of a power or function at a meeting of the authority. In case of a tie vote on a motion or resolution pending before the authority the motion or resolution shall be presented to the governor and if approved, is considered adopted by the authority. The authority may meet and transact business by electronic media if (1) public notice of the time and locations where the meeting will be held by electronic media has been given in the same manner as if the meeting were held in a single location; (2) participants and members of the public in attendance can hear and have the same right to participate in the meeting as if the meeting were conducted in person; and (3) copies of pertinent reference materials, statutes, regulations, and audio-visual materials are reasonably available to participants and to the public. A meeting by electronic media as provided in this subsection has the same legal effect as a meeting in person.

The public members of the authority receive $100 compensation for each day spent on official business of the authority and may be reimbursed by the authority for actual and necessary expenses at the same rate paid to members of state boards under AS

39.20.180

.

The authority may appoint persons as officers it considers advisable, including an executive director, and may employ professional advisors, counsel, technical experts, agents, and other employees it considers advisable. The executive director and employees of the authority are in the exempt service under AS 39.25.

The authority shall keep minutes of each meeting and send a certified copy to the governor and to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am §§ 52, 53 ch 106 SLA 1980; am §§ 29, 30 ch 115 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.050. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.88.060.
Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority revolving fund.

The Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority revolving fund is established in the authority. The revolving fund consists of appropriations made to the revolving fund by the legislature, money or other assets transferred to the revolving fund by the authority, and unrestricted payments on loans made or purchased by the authority. Unless otherwise expressly stated, the accounts created in this chapter are accounts in the revolving fund. The authority may create additional accounts either in the revolving fund or outside the revolving fund. Subject to agreements made with the holders of the authority’s bonds or with other persons, the authority may transfer amounts in an account in the revolving fund to another account in the revolving fund. Amounts deposited in the revolving fund may be pledged to the payment of bonds of the authority or expended for the purposes of the authority under this chapter. The authority has the powers and responsibilities established in AS

37.10.071

with respect to the investment of amounts held in the revolving fund.

History.

(§ 3 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 123 SLA 1990)